Massachusetts, session 194th, H3961.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 4G of chapter 111 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following paragraph:-
The department shall develop informational resources on sudden unexpected death in
epilepsy or “SUDEP” and other epilepsy-related mortalities to provide to epilepsy patients, their
families and health care providers. The information shall include, but not be limited to: (i)
current and evidence-based information about SUDEP and other epilepsy-related mortality risk
factors; (ii) contact information for non-profit organizations that provide support services for
patients with epilepsy conditions; and (iii) information on mitigating the risks of SUDEP and
other epilepsy-related mortalities. The department shall make the informational resources
available on its website in a manner that is easily accessible to patients, families and health care
providers.
of 2

SECTION 2. Not later than 1 year following the passage of this act, the department of
public health shall submit to the clerks of the house of representatives and the senate and the
joint committee on public health a report including a summary of relevant metrics, which shall
include, but not be limited to: (i) the information gathered for the informational resources; (ii) its
efforts to provide this information to patients, families and health care providers; (iii) the effects
of the informational resources on patient outcomes; and (iv) obstacles encountered in
disseminating informational resources. The department shall incorporate public input in the
development of the report.
SECTION 3. The department of public health shall conduct a statewide campaign to raise
public awareness about SUDEP and other epilepsy-related mortalities.
of 2